Utah statutes.
63M-1-606.   Adviser -- Duties and powers.

(1)  The adviser shall be appointed by the governor.

(2)  The adviser shall be experienced or knowledgeable in the application of science and technology to business, industry, or public problems and shall have demonstrated interest in or ability to contribute to the accomplishment of the purposes of this part.

(3)  The adviser shall be compensated pursuant to the wage and salary classification plan for appointed officers of the state currently in effect.

(4) (a)  The adviser shall have those duties and powers the council assigns.

(b)  The adviser, with the advice of the council, may enter into contracts and agreements and may incur expenses necessary to fulfill the purposes of this part.

(5)  The adviser shall be administratively responsible to the director of the office.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

